Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB166.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 186.400 TO 186.640 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
The Transportation Cabinet shall establish at least one (1) permanent, full-time, driver
license regional office within each county with a population of fifty thousand (50,000)
or more.
SECTION 2. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 186 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) In any county in which at least one (1) permanent Transportation Cabinet driver
license regional office is not located, the Transportation Cabinet shall expand the
availability of driver licensing services by setting up a system in which the county
clerk, through a mutual agreement between the clerk and the Transportation
Cabinet, may issue operator's licenses and personal identification cards for
residents of that county.
(2) In any county where the county clerk issues operator's licenses and personal
identification cards pursuant to subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The Transportation Cabinet shall purchase and install all equipment and
hardware necessary for the county clerk to begin performing driver
licensing services; and
(b) The fees prescribed by Section 3 of this Act shall apply and the county clerk
shall retain twenty-five percent (25%) from the portion of the fees directed
to the license fund for each document request processed.
Section 3. KRS 186.531 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "GF" means the general fund;
(b) "IP" means instruction permit;
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
(c) "License fund" or "LF" means the KYTC photo license account created in
KRS 174.056;
(d) "MC" means motorcycle;
(e) "MC fund" or "MCF" means the motorcycle safety education program fund
established in KRS 176.5065;
(f) "OL" means operator's license; and
(g) "PIDC" means personal identification card.
(2) The fees imposed for voluntary travel ID operator's licenses, instruction permits,
and personal identification cards shall be as follows. The fees received shall be
distributed as shown in the table. The fees shown, unless otherwise noted, are for an
eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
OL (initial/renewal) $48 $48 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $18 $18 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $18 $16 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $18 $13 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $48 $38 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $58 $48 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $28 $25 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
(3) Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, the fees imposed for standard
operator's licenses, instruction permits, and personal identification cards shall be as
follows and, unless otherwise noted, are for an eight (8) year period:
Card Type Fee LF GF MCF
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
OL (initial/renewal) $43 $43 $0 $0
OL (Under 21) (Up to 4 years) $15 $15 $0 $0
Any OL, MC, or combination
(duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.25 $1.75 $0
Motor vehicle IP (3 years) $15 $13 $2 $0
Motorcycle IP (1 year) $15 $10 $1 $4
Motorcycle OL (initial/renewal) $43 $33 $0 $10
Combination vehicle/MC OL
(initial/renewal) $53 $43 $0 $10
PIDC (initial/renewal) $23 $20 $3 $0
PIDC (duplicate/corrected) $15 $13.50 $1.50 $0
PIDC (no fixed address) under
KRS 186.4122(5)/186.4123(5)
(initial, duplicate, or corrected) $0 $0 $0 $0
(4) The fee for a four (4) year original or renewal license issued pursuant to KRS
186.4101 shall be fifty percent (50%) of the amount shown in subsections (2) and
(3) of this section. The distribution of fees shown in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section shall also be reduced by fifty percent (50%) for licenses that are issued for
four (4) years.
(5) Any fee for any identity document applied for using alternative technology under
KRS 186.410 and 186.4122 shall be distributed in the same manner as a document
applied for in person with the cabinet.
(6) (a) An applicant for an original or renewal operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card
shall be requested by the cabinet to make a donation to promote an organ
donor program.
(b) The donation under this subsection shall be added to the regular fee for an
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
original or renewal motor vehicle operator's license, permit, commercial
driver's license, motorcycle operator's license, or personal identification card.
One (1) donation may be made per issuance or renewal of a license or any
combination thereof.
(c) The fee shall be paid to the cabinet and shall be forwarded by the cabinet on a
monthly basis to the Kentucky Circuit Court Clerks' Trust for Life, and such
moneys are hereby appropriated to be used exclusively for the purpose of
promoting an organ donor program. A donation under this subsection shall be
voluntary and may be refused by the applicant at the time of issuance or
renewal.
(7) In addition to the fees outlined in this section, the following individuals, upon
application for an initial or renewal operator's license, instruction permit, or
personal identification card, shall pay an additional application fee of thirty dollars
($30), which shall be deposited in the photo license account:
(a) An applicant who is not a United States citizen or permanent resident and who
applies under KRS 186.4121 or 186.4123; or
(b) An applicant who is applying for a instruction permit, operator's license, or
personal identification card without a photo under KRS 186.4102(9).
(8) (a) Except for individuals exempted under paragraph (c) of this subsection, an
applicant for relicensing after revocation or suspension shall pay a
reinstatement fee of forty dollars ($40).
(b) The reinstatement fee under this subsection shall be distributed by the State
Treasurer as follows:
1. Thirty-five dollars ($35) shall be deposited into the photo license
account; and
2. Five dollars ($5) shall be deposited into a trust and agency fund to be
used in defraying the costs and expenses of administering a driver
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
improvement program for problem drivers.
(c) This subsection shall not apply to:
1. Any person whose license was suspended for failure to meet the
conditions set out in KRS 186.411 when, within one (1) year of
suspension, the driving privileges of the individual are reinstated; or
2. A student who has had his or her license revoked pursuant to KRS
159.051.
(9) As payment for any fee identified in this section, the cabinet:
(a) Shall accept cash and personal checks;
(b) May accept other methods of payment in accordance with KRS 45.345; and
(c) May enter into billing agreements with homeless shelters, health care
facilities, or social service agencies that serve individuals without an
established and fixed nighttime residence of regular return.
(10) There shall be no fee assessed for the initial, renewal, or duplicate standard personal
identification card to an individual, if the individual:
(a) Does not possess a valid operator's license or a commercial driver's license;
and
(b) Is at least eighteen (18) years of age on or before the next regular election.
(11) For any document issued by a county clerk in accordance with Section 2 of this
Act, the county clerk shall retain twenty-five percent (25%) from the portion of
the fees imposed by this section that are directed to the license fund.
Section 4. KRS 186.577 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The following persons shall submit to a test of visual acuity and visual field at
the time of application or renewal:
1. All persons applying for an initial or renewal operator's license;
2. All persons applying for an initial or renewal instruction permit; and
3. Any person required to complete an examination under KRS 186.635.
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
(2) Vision testing under this section shall be administered to any person:
(a) Applying for an initial operator's license, an initial instruction permit, or
reinstatement of a license when vision must be tested as required in KRS
186.480:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By Kentucky State Police at the time of application;
(b) Applying for operator's license renewal or instruction permit renewal:
1. Prior to the time of application under subsection (5) of this section; or
2. By the Transportation Cabinet at the time of application; or
(c) Identified in Kentucky administrative regulations promulgated by the
Transportation Cabinet or the Kentucky State Police as being required to
undergo the exam required by KRS 186.480.
(3) (a) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet without
corrective lenses shall not have a restriction placed on their driving privileges.
(b) Persons whose visual acuity is 20/40 or better and who meet or exceed the
visual field standard established by the Transportation Cabinet with corrective
lenses shall have their driving privileges restricted to mandate the use of the
corrective lenses.
(c) If a person fails to meet a 20/40 visual acuity standard or the visual field
standard established by the cabinet, the person shall be referred to a vision
specialist for examination.
(4) A person referred to a vision specialist under subsection (3) of this section whose
visual acuity is 20/60 or better and who meets or exceeds the visual field standard
established by the cabinet shall be eligible to test for an instruction permit or
operator's license, or shall be eligible for operator's license renewal. If corrective
lenses were prescribed by the vision specialist, the person's driving privileges shall
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
be restricted to mandate the use of the corrective lenses.
(5) Vision tests administered under subsection (2)(a) of this section shall be deemed to
meet the testing provisions outlined in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, if the
person submits a driver vision testing form that complies with the provisions of
subsection (6) of this section and the form has been completed by:
(a) A vision specialist; or
(b) An osteopath, physician, or advanced practice registered nurse who is
credentialed by the cabinet to perform vision testing under this section.
(6) All driver vision testing forms completed under subsection (5) of this section shall:
(a) Attest that the applicant meets or exceeds the visual acuity standard and visual
field standard established by the cabinet;
(b) Only be valid if the vision specialist or the credentialed osteopath,
credentialed physician, or credentialed advanced practice registered nurse
signed and completed the vision testing form less than twelve (12) months
prior to the date of application or renewal;
(c) State whether the driving privileges of the applicant shall be restricted to
mandate the use of corrective lenses; and
(d) Clearly indicate that the vision testing under this section is a screening for
minimum vision standards established in this section and is not a complete
eye examination.
(7) Any person seeking application or permit under subsection (1) of this section shall
attest that he or she has submitted to and passed the visual acuity and visual field
tests required under this section.
(8) Any person renewing an operator's license under KRS 186.416 shall be exempt
from the vision testing requirements outlined in this section.
(9) Persons who meet the requirements of KRS 186.578 and are issued operator's
licenses under KRS 186.579 shall:
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1501
(a) Have their driving privileges restricted to the use of a bioptic telescopic
device; and
(b) Be exempt from this section.
(10) All driver vision testing results shall be disclosed to the driver in a private area or
via private communications.
(11) The Transportation Cabinet shall ensure each driver license regional office is
equipped with adequate vision testing equipment to support the average daily
appointment volume.
(12) The Transportation Cabinet shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to
KRS Chapter 13A to implement the provisions of this section, including but not
limited to establishing visual field standards, the creation of a driver vision testing
form, and establishing a credentialing process for osteopaths, physicians, and
advanced practice registered nurses to conduct vision testing under this section.
(13)[(11)] The Transportation Cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations
pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to:
(a) Implement a system for electronic transmission of driver vision testing forms
and accompanying documentation; and
(b) Assess a fee to an applicant to cover the administrative costs of performing
on-site vision testing. Any funds received from this fee shall be deposited into
the photo license account established in KRS 174.056.
Section 5. This Act takes effect July 1, 2026.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 2/11/2025 10:55 AM Jacketed